Illinois, session 104th, SB2668.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $250,000, or so much of that sum as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 7for grants to be paid to the Chicago Transit Authority to pay 8for an ambulance equipped with advanced life-saving (ALS) 9capabilities and emergency medical services (EMS) personnel at 10the Forest Park Blue Line terminal located at 711 Des Plaines 11Avenue. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 132025.